Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska54-2307
Denial of permit; when.

The department may deny a domesticated cervine animal facility permit to an applicant who is or has been convicted of violating the laws or regulations of this state or any other state pertaining to domesticated cervine animals or has knowingly committed or participated in the violation of an order of quarantine or other disciplinary order issued by the department.

Laws 1999, LB 404, § 6.